Illinois, session 104th, HB925.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Children and Family Services 5Statewide Youth Advisory Board Act is amended by changing 6Section 1 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 527/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Department of Children and Family Services Statewide Youth 10Advisory Board Act.11(Source: P.A. 98-806, eff. 1-1-15.)